North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 4E. Pest Control Compact.

§§ 106-65.55 through 106-65.61.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-265, s. 12, effective July 17, 2013.

History.

Ss. 106-65.55—106-65.61; 1975, c. 810, ss. 1-7; repealed by 2013-265, s. 12, effective July 17, 2013.

§§ 106-65.62 through 106-65.66.

Reserved for future codification purposes.